Georgia, session 2025_26, HB826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Overtime Income Tax Exemption Act."
SECTION 2.
The purpose of this Act is to reduce the tax burden on workers who earn overtime pay,
incentivize productivity, and promote economic fairness for hourly employees.
H. B. 826
- 1 -

LC 59 0136
SECTION 3.
Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
imposition, rate, computation, exemptions, and credits for state income tax, is amended in
subsection (a) of Code Section 48-7-27, relating to the computation of taxable net income,
by deleting "and" at the end of paragraph (14), by replacing the period at the end of
paragraph (15) with "; and", and by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(16)(A) Up to $10,000.00 of income received by a full-time hourly waged employee
as compensation for work performed in excess of 40 hours in a week, provided that
such income is included in the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income and, but for this
paragraph, would be subject to taxation by this state.
(B) For the tax year beginning on January 1, 2026, and each tax year thereafter, each
employer shall submit to the department, on forms prescribed by the department, the
total amount received by full-time hourly waged employees as compensation for work
performed in excess of 40 hours in a week, the total number of employees for which
such compensation was paid, and additional information as may be required by the
commissioner to effectuate this paragraph. Such data shall be provided monthly or
quarterly and shall be due no later than the due date for the corresponding monthly or
quarterly withholding tax returns.
(C) No later than January 31, 2028, the department shall submit a report to the General
Assembly documenting the fiscal impact of the income tax exemption provided in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. The General Assembly may adjust tax rates or
identify alternative revenue sources to address revenue shortfalls resulting from such
exemption and modify or extend such exemption at any time before the repeal of this
paragraph.
(D) This paragraph shall stand repealed and reserved on December 31, 2030."
H. B. 826
- 2 -

LC 59 0136
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 826
- 3 -